Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201774-1333
Crossings; public; maintenance.

The owner of any railroad tracks which are crossed by a public road shall make and keep in good repair good and sufficient crossings for such road over its tracks, including all the grading, bridges, ditches, and culverts that may be necessary within its right-of-way. Such crossings shall be not less than twenty feet wide and shall be solidly constructed with no openings or filled spaces except such as are necessary for the track. The railroad crossings shall be made of durable material equal to the height of the railroad track. The Department of Transportation may, upon proper investigation and hearing, impose additional reasonable requirements as the circumstances may warrant.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 11, p. 1402;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 86;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-411;

Laws 1997, LB 255, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 257.